Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 5. Emergencies on Party Telephone Lines

§ 3801.
Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Party line” means a subscribers’ line telephone circuit, consisting of two or more main telephone stations connected therewith, each station with a distinctive ring or telephone number.

“Emergency” means a situation in which property or human life is in jeopardy and the prompt summoning of aid is essential.

§ 3802.
Refusal to surrender line in an emergency.

A person shall not willfully refuse to surrender the use of a party line to another person for the purpose of permitting such other person to report a fire or summon police, medical or other aid in case of emergency.

§ 3803.
Declaring emergency falsely.

A person shall not request the use of a party line on pretext that an emergency exists, knowing that an emergency does not exist.

§ 3804.
Notice in telephone directories.

Every telephone directory hereafter distributed to the members of the general public shall contain a copy of this subchapter, printed in type which is no smaller than eight-point type and is headed by the word “warning” in larger and bold-faced type.
The provisions of this section do not apply to directories published solely for business purposes, commonly known as classified directories.

§ 3805.
Penalties.

A person who violates this subchapter shall be fined not more than $300.00 or imprisoned for not more than one month, or both.